Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2363.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2323(a)(1), 2328(a) and 2341(b) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 2323. Tagging and reporting big game kills.(a) Tags issued with licenses.--(1) Each licensed person who kills any big game shall, immediately after the killing and before removing the big game from the location of the killing, fully complete [the proper game kill tag in compliance with the instructions printed on the tag and attach only the game kill tag to the big game. The attached game kill tag shall remain on the big game until such time as the big game is processed for 12345678910111213141516171819 consumption or prepared for mounting.] all tagging and reporting requirements as prescribed in regulations promulgated by the commission. IF THE COMMISSION AUTHORIZES A VIRTUAL OR ELECTRONIC TAGGING OPTION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION SHALL ALSO MAKE AVAILABLE, WITHOUT CHARGE, A PHYSICAL TAGGING OPTION.* * *§ 2328. Shipping or transporting big game.(a) General rule.--Unless properly tagged in the manner prescribed under section 2323 (relating to tagging and reporting big game kills), it is unlawful for any person to ship or transport the carcass of any big game. [The tag shall contain in English the name, address and license number of the owner and the location where the big game was killed.]* * *§ 2341. Possession and transportation of small game.* * *(b) Transportation without owner present.--Properly tagged small game unaccompanied by the owner may be transported [if a hand-made tag is attached to the small game containing in English the name, address, license number and the signature of the person who killed the small game.] as long as it meets the tagging and reporting requirements as prescribed in regulations promulgated by the commission. IF THE COMMISSION AUTHORIZES A VIRTUAL OR ELECTRONIC TAGGING OPTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL ALSO MAKE AVAILABLE, WITHOUT CHARGE, A PHYSICAL TAGGING OPTION.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2363PN3189 - 2 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829